New York, session 2025-2026, A1225.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be referred to 2 as the "Restrict Insurrectionists from Office Taking (RIOT) Act". 3 § 2. Subdivision 1-a of section 3 of the public officers law is 4 amended by adding a new paragraph (iii) to read as follows: 5 (iii) No person shall be capable of holding an elected office, a 6 judgeship or an appointed position who shall stand convicted of violat- 7 ing 18 U.S.C. § 2383. 8 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02170-01-5